DTC B1318 [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]


id0102c3842300

DTC B1318

Fuel additive control module B+ voltage low

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The Fuel additive control module monitors the supply voltage of battery positive terminal at fuel additive control module terminals 1 and 3. If the fuel additive control module detected battery positive terminal voltage below 10 V during 20 seconds, the fuel additive control module determines that the power supply system has malfunction.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Melt down fuse
•  Open circuit in wiring between ENG +B fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 1
•  Short to ground between ENG +B fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 1
•  Open circuit in wiring between ENGINE fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 3
•  Short to ground between ENGINE fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 3
•  Poor connection of fuel additive control module connector
•  PCM malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has the FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related service repair information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
•  Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
•  Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERNS TROUBLESHOOTING”.
4
VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
•  Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
•  Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERNS TROUBLESHOOTING”.
5
INSPECT POWER SUPPLY CIRCUIT
•  Turn the engine switch to off.
•  Measure voltage between fuel additive control module terminal 1 (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage B+?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the wiring harness, then go to Step 8.
6
INSPECT IG1 SIGNAL CIRCUIT
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
•  Measure voltage between fuel additive control module terminal 3 (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
•  Is the voltage B+?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the wiring harness, then go to Step 8.
7
INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE CONTROL MODULE CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Disconnect fuel additive control module connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair terminals, then go to Step 8.
No
Go to the next step.
8
VERIFY THAT DTC B1318 TROUBLESHOOTING IS COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Clear DTC from PCM memory using M-MDS.
•  Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Replace the Fuel additive control module, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
9
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform the after repair procedure.
•  Are any DTCs present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
No
DTC troubleshooting completed.